Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1528
Trainer; employment authorized, when.

A licensed hearing instrument specialist who is certified by the National Board for Certification in Hearing Instrument Sciences or has an advanced credential recognized by the board may work for a company or organization as a trainer and provide specialized training in the practical application of hearing instrument sciences.

Laws 2025, LB332, § 32.